District of Columbia statutes.
31-2012

Notices.

All notices by the Commissioner to an insurer which may result in regulatory action hereunder shall be effective upon dispatch if transmitted by registered or certified mail, or in the case of any other transmission shall be effective upon the insurer’s receipt of such notice.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-233, § 13, 44 DCR 765
1981 Ed., § 35-4612.